Wyoming statutes. Title 4 Trusts
Article 11. Miscellaneous Provisions

§ 4-10-1101.
Uniformity of application and construction.

In applying and construing this act, consideration shall be given to the need to promote uniformity of the law with respect to its subject matter among states that enact it. With respect to article 5 of this act, a court shall not give consideration to cases from jurisdictions that have adopted some version of the Uniform Trust Code, but have not modified article 5 of the Uniform Trust Code in a manner similar to article 5 of this act.

History.

Laws 2003, ch. 124, § 1; 2007, ch. 155, § 2.

The 2007 amendment,

effective July 1, 2007, added the last sentence.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 4-10-103(a)(xxvi).

§ 4-10-1102.
Electronic records and signatures.

The provisions of this act governing the legal effect, validity or enforceability of electronic records or electronic signatures, and of contracts formed or performed with the use of such records or signatures, conform to the requirements of Section 102 of the Electronic Signatures in Global and National Commerce Act (15 U.S.C. Section 7002) and supersede, modify, and limit the requirements of the Electronic Signatures in Global and National Commerce Act.

History.

Laws 2003, ch. 124, § 1.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 4-10-103(a)(xxvi).

§ 4-10-1103.
Application to existing relationships.

Except as otherwise provided in this act and subsections (c) through (e) of this section, on July 1, 2003:

This act, applies to all trusts created on or after July 1, 2003;

This act applies to all judicial proceedings concerning trusts created on or after July 1, 2003, and to all judicial proceedings concerning trusts created before July 1, 2003 that have elected to be governed by this act as provided in subsection (c) of this section;

Any rule of administration, construction or presumption provided in this act shall not apply to trust instruments executed before July 1, 2003, unless subsection (c), (d) or (e) of this section is applicable;

An action taken before July 1, 2003, is not affected by this act and any review of actions taken before July 1, 2003 by a trustee or other person shall be reviewed under the law and standards applicable at the time the action was taken unless subsection (c), (d) or (e) of this section is applicable.

If a right is acquired, extinguished or barred upon the expiration of a prescribed period that has commenced to run under any other statute before July 1, 2003, that statute continues to apply to the right even if it has been repealed or superseded.

This act applies to a trust created before July 1, 2003 if the settlor, if living, and all qualified beneficiaries consent to the application. If the settlor is not living, this act may apply to a trust created before July 1, 2003 if all qualified beneficiaries and the trustee consent to the application. If all of the qualified beneficiaries do not consent to a proposed application of this act to the trust, the court may apply this act to the trust after determining that the interests of the nonconsenting qualified beneficiary will be adequately protected.

The provisions of the prior Uniform Trustees Powers Act and Uniform Prudent Investor Act that have been incorporated into this act as W.S.

4-10-816

and

4-10-901

through

4-10-913

, respectively, shall apply to any trust created prior to April 1, 2003, unless the trust instrument states otherwise.

This act shall apply to a trust created before July 1, 2003 if the principal place of administration of the trust is changed from a jurisdiction other than Wyoming to Wyoming on or after July 1, 2003 or if on or after July 1, 2003, a person whose principal place of business is located in, or who is a resident of, Wyoming becomes a trustee of the trust or a trustee moves the trustee’s principal place of business to, or becomes a resident of, Wyoming.

History.

Laws 2003, ch. 124, § 1; 2005, ch. 126, § 2; 2008, ch. 80, § 1; 2021 ch. 53, § 2, effective July 1, 2021.

The 2005 amendment

added (d); and updated an internal reference in (a) accordingly.

Laws 2005, ch. 126, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved February 25, 2005.

The 2008 amendment,

effective July 1, 2008, in (a)(ii), substituted “created” for “commenced” and inserted “and to all judicial proceedings concerning trusts created before July 1, 2003 that have elected to be governed by this act as provided in subsection (c) of this section” at the end; inserted present (a)(iii); redesignated former (a)(iii) as (a)(iv), and inserted “and any review of actions taken before July 1, 2003 by a trustee or other person shall be reviewed under the law and standards applicable at the time the action was taken unless subsection (c) or (d) of this act is applicable” therein; and in (c), inserted “and the trustee” in the second sentence.

The 2021 amendment,

effective July 1, 2021, substituted "through (e)" for "and (d)" in (a); added "or (e)" in (a)(iii); in (a)(iv), added "or (e)," substituted "section" for "act" preceding "is applicable"; added (e); and made related changes.

Editor's notes. —

The Uniform Trustees' Powers Act and Uniform Prudent Investor Act were codified as chapters 8 and 9 or this title, respectively, before being repealed by Laws 2003, ch. 124, § 3.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 4-10-103(a)(xxvi).